South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3915.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  This act may be cited as the "South Carolina Clean Air Act." SECTION 2.  Section 48-1-110(e) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (e)(1) It shall beis unlawful for any person, directly or indirectly, negligently or willfullywilfully, to discharge any air contaminant or other substance in the ambient air that shall cause an undesirablea hazardous level. (2)(A) It is unlawful for a person to intentionally inject, release, or disperse, by any means, chemicals, chemical compounds, substances, or apparatus and energy frequencies manipulation within the borders of the State in the atmosphere with the express purpose of affecting temperature, weather, or the intensity of storms and the dimming of the sunlight. The prohibitions of this item include the manipulation of weather systems in storing through the means of aerosol injection chemicals, chemical compounds, substances, or apparatus for the purpose of intensifying the weather for any reason to harm persons or destroy property. (B) Notwithstanding the penalties set forth in Section 48-1-320, a person who intentionally violates this item is guilty of a felony and upon conviction, the person may be imprisoned up to ten years and must be fined not less than five hundred thousand dollars for each day's violation. (C) The provisions of this item do not apply to any person whose cloud seeding is a result of a publicly approved contract. (3) The Department of Environmental Services must make information available to the public detailing the harmful effects to a person's health and personal property that result from chemicals being released into the atmosphere. No exemption to the state Freedom of Information Act prohibits the release of documents, reports, and other records relating to stratospheric aerosol injection or any other prohibited conduct, upon request. (4)(A) Notwithstanding any provision of state or federal law to the contrary, a private citizen may file a private action against the federal government for the destruction of health and personal property. (B) A private citizen who files a private action pursuant to this item is entitled to civil and criminal immunity for any testimony provided, including whistleblower immunity. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----